test/src/morphology/N-kieuzh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kieuž*: # Noun 112 'eng /est köis/fin' - full paradigm
     kieuž*+N+Sg+Nom: kieuž*
     kieuž*+N+Sg+Gen: kieud
     kieuž*+N+Sg+Par: kīeta
     kieuž*+N+Sg+Dat: kieudõn
     kieuž*+N+Sg+Ins: kieudkõks
     kieuž*+N+Sg+Ill: kieudõ
     kieuž*+N+Sg+Ela: kieudstõ
     kieuž*+N+Pl+Nom: kīedõd
     kieuž*+N+Pl+Gen: kīedõd
     kieuž*+N+Pl+Par: kieuži
     kieuž*+N+Pl+Dat: kīedõdõn
     kieuž*+N+Pl+Ins: kīedõdõks
     kieuž*+N+Pl+Ill: kieužiz
     kieuž*+N+Pl+Ela: kieužist
